District of Columbia statutes.
4-323

Purposes.

The purposes of this subchapter are to:

(1)

Provide procedures for interstate children’s adoption assistance payments, including medical payments; and

(2)

Authorize the Mayor to enter into interstate agreements with agencies of other states for the protection of children on behalf of whom adoption assistance is being provided by the District.

History

June 27, 2000, D.C. Law 13-136, § 403, 47 DCR 2850